Missouri, session 2026, HB3219.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 572, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 572.075, to read as follows:
572.075. 1. A person commits the offense of operation of a video lottery terminal
if he or she owns, rents, or leases video lottery games and video lottery game terminals.
For the purposes of this section, a "video lottery game terminal" is any device that,
through an electronic, mechanical, or electromechanical process, including through the
use of any application, software, or other system that accepts legal tender, credits or
tickets, or forms of digital currency to play, and through which is used to generate a
prize of money or form of credit that can be redeemed for money or another form of
monetary payment that is presented to the player by a set or combination of
alphanumeric symbols or lines of symbols that determine the amount of the prize,
regardless of the operating system that determined the prize.
2. The offense of operation of a video lottery terminal is a class E felony.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to excursion gambling boats
licensed by the Missouri gaming commission under sections 313.800 to 313.850.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.